Utah statutes.
59-10-504.   Returns made by fiduciaries and receivers.
Any fiduciary or receiver required to make a return for federal income tax
purposes under the provisions of Section 6012(b) of the Internal Revenue Code
shall make and file the corresponding state return for state income tax
purposes.
